Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 40 Probate And Grant Of Administration
28-40-113. Contest of will generally.

An interested person may contest the probate of a will, or any part thereof, by stating in writing the grounds of his or her objection and filing them in the court.

No will can be contested unless the grounds of objection are filed within the periods hereinafter provided:

If the ground of objection is that another will of the decedent has been discovered, the ground of objection must be filed before final distribution of the estate is ordered and within the period stated in § 28-40-103;

If the contest is on any other ground and if the contestant or the person through whom he or she derives his or her interest in the estate:

Has been given notice, other than by publication, of the hearing of a petition for probate as provided in § 28-40-110, his or her grounds for objection must be filed at or prior to the time of the hearing on the petition for probate;

Has been notified of the admission of the will to probate in the manner provided by § 28-40-111 and is not barred by subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section, his or her grounds of objection must be filed within three (3) months after the date of the first publication of the notice of the admission of the will to probate;

Is not barred by the provisions of subdivision (b)(2)(A) or (B) of this section, but notice of the admission of the will to probate has been published as provided in § 28-40-111, whether or not published promptly, and a copy thereof has been served upon the contestant or the person through whom he or she derives his or her interest in the estate in accordance with § 28-1-112(b)(1), (2), or (3), the contestant must file his or her grounds for objection to the probate of the will within three (3) months after the first publication of notice of the probate or within forty-five (45) days after a copy of the notice was served upon him or her or his or her predecessor in interest in the estate, whichever period shall last expire; and

Is not barred by any of the provisions of subdivision (b)(2)(A), (B), or (C) of this section, his or her grounds for objection must be filed within three (3) years after the admission of the will to probate; and

The grounds for objection to a foreign will which has been admitted to probate in this state must be filed within the same time as though it were a will of a resident of this state, or thereafter within forty-five (45) days after the rendition of an order of a court of competent jurisdiction in the state of the domicile of the decedent, setting aside the probate of the will therein.

Ark. L. Notes.

Sampson, Burden Shifting in Will Contest Cases: An Examination and a Proposal that the Arkansas Supreme Court Reconcile Arkansas Rules of Evidence Rule 301 with its Undue Influence Case Law, 1996 Ark. L. Notes 87.

Ark. L. Rev.

Probate Code Amendments, 5 Ark. L. Rev. 377. Jackson v. Braden, 290 Ark. 117, 717 S.W.2d 206 (1986).

When surviving son offered a will for probate, he had the burden of proving the genuineness of the signatures; he made such proof, and the will was admitted to probate. When other persons sought to contest the will, they had the burden of sustaining the contest on the alleged ground that the signatures to the will were a forgery. Ross v. Edwards, 231 Ark. 902, 333 S.W.2d 487 (1960).

Substantial evidence supported a probate court finding that testator's first wife, who claimed a dower interest in estate, had not carried the burden of proving invalidity of second marriage merely by showing validity of her marriage to deceased and the absence of any court record of divorce in any one of three counties of her state, as valid divorce could have been granted elsewhere. Miller v. Miller, 237 Ark. 66, 371 S.W.2d 511 (1963).

The party contesting the validity of the will has the burden of proving by the preponderance of the evidence that the testator lacked mental capacity at the time the will was executed or that the testator acted under undue influence. Wells v. Estate of Wells, 325 Ark. 16, 922 S.W.2d 715 (1996).

Where five separate contests of a will were appealed from the probate court to the circuit court, they were properly consolidated for trial as a single case. First Nat'l Bank v. Ary, 180 Ark. 1084, 24 S.W.2d 336 (1930) (decision under prior law).

If the instrument offered was a will, it was to be admitted to probate, and its construction and interpretation were to be left to other courts having jurisdiction of the matter. Powell v. Hayes, 176 Ark. 660, 3 S.W.2d 974 (1928) (decision under prior law).

Where no attack was made on a will within six months after it was duly probated and notice thereof published, the plaintiff was barred by limitations from contesting it. Montgomery v. Blankenship, 217 Ark. 357, 230 S.W.2d 51, 21 A.L.R.2d 212 (1950) (decision under prior law).

The will of a person who had a domicil in another state in which the will was probated, insofar as it related to the devolution of either real or personal property in this state, could be contested, provided that full faith and credit had to be given by each state to the public acts, records, and judicial proceedings of every other state. Schweitzer v. Bean, 154 Ark. 228, 242 S.W. 63 (1922) (decision under prior law).

A party interested in the probate of the will of a nonresident could contest the probate upon the grounds of incapacity or undue influence. Selle v. Rapp, 143 Ark. 192, 220 S.W. 662, 13 A.L.R. 494 (1920) (decision under prior law).

Pursuant to subsection (b), if a will contest was on any ground other than that another will had been discovered, and if the will contestant had been given proper notice, the contestant's grounds for objection had to be filed at or prior to the time of the hearing on the petition for probate; this section does not allow a party to make an oral objection to a will such that, while all the beneficiaries may not have been properly served, they had constructive and actual notice of the probating of the will. West v. Williams, 355 Ark. 148, 133 S.W.3d 388 (2003).

While, in a will contest, it would have been better practice to determine, as a preliminary question, the interest of any contestant whose right to sue as heir was disputed, the court could, in its discretion, submit to the jury this question, together with the main issue. Flowers v. Flowers, 74 Ark. 212, 85 S.W. 242 (1905) (decision under prior law).

Brothers and sisters of testator, who left surviving him heir in person of adopted son, were not “interested” persons, entitled to sue to set aside testator's will. Hawkins v. Hawkins, 218 Ark. 423, 236 S.W.2d 733 (1951).

Just any collateral heir is not necessarily an “interested person” with a right to contest the probate of a will under this section. Mabry v. Mabry, 259 Ark. 622, 535 S.W.2d 824 (1976).

Remote heirs, decedent's sister, nieces and nephew, were not “interested persons” entitled to contest a will under subsection (a) because they would not have taken by intestate succession at that time since decedent's two daughters were were still living. Hardie v. Estate of Davis, 312 Ark. 189, 848 S.W.2d 417 (1993).

A daughter of the decedent, who received an equal share under the will at issue, had standing to question the validity of the will, notwithstanding that her interest was not detrimentally affected by the will. Barrera v. Vanpelt, 332 Ark. 482, 965 S.W.2d 780 (1998).

Trial court had authority to consider a challenge to decedent's will subsequent to a hearing at which it orally announced its decision to admit a purported will to probate because no written order had been entered and filed of record from the prior hearing; subsection (b) of this section was not applicable because the trial court never lost subject-matter jurisdiction and was free to hear additional evidence and to alter its decision upon further consideration of the facts and circumstances surrounding the will. Judkins v. Hoover, 351 Ark. 552, 95 S.W.3d 768 (2003), overruled in part, West v. Williams, 355 Ark. 148, 133 S.W.3d 388 (2003).

A petition by a minor to set aside the probate of a will filed after statutory period had expired was properly dismissed, since no exception in favor of minors is provided for by this section. Brown v. Hawkins, 219 Ark. 239, 240 S.W.2d 863 (1951).

The limitation contained in subsection (b)(2) of this section does not apply to an action by pretermitted children against the sole devisee of their father's will for partition of the real estate devised in the will. Negovanov v. Wensko, 248 Ark. 1109, 455 S.W.2d 929 (1970).

In a will contest pursuant to this section, admission of a testator's will to probate was proper because preponderance of the evidence supported the circuit court's finding that both sons had confidential relationships with the testator, that the testator had testamentary capacity when he executed his will, and that the will was not the result of undue influence.Breckenridge v. Breckenridge, 2010 Ark. App. 277, 375 S.W.3d 651 (2010).

A court of equity was not authorized to review the decision of the probate court upon the probate of a will where there had been no appeal to the circuit court. Mitchell v. Rogers, 40 Ark. 91 (1882) (decision under prior law).

After a probate court has probated a will, necessarily putting testamentary capacity in issue, equity has no jurisdiction to review this capacity, even though no jurisdictional objection is made, unless there is extrinsic fraud upon the probate court because the Arkansas Constitution places exclusive probate jurisdiction in the probate court. O'Dell v. Newton, 224 Ark. 541, 275 S.W.2d 453 (1955).

Due deference will be given to the superior position of the probate judge to determine the credibility of the witnesses and the weight to be accorded their testimony. Wells v. Estate of Wells, 325 Ark. 16, 922 S.W.2d 715 (1996).

Trial court erred in finding that decedent's spouse and brother did not procure the will, and, as such, they were obligated to rebut the presumption of undue influence, however, nothing in the record suggested that their influence operated to override the decedent's discretion or destroy the decedent's free will, and a medical doctor and other disinterested witnesses testified that the decedent was of sound mind when decedent executed his will; thus, the trial court's error was harmless. In re Estate of Garrett, 81 Ark. App. 212, 100 S.W.3d 72 (2003).

A judgment admitting a will to probate could not be set aside for fraud on ground that judgment was based on copy instead of original will, since representation was not extrinsic. Blankenship v. Montgomery, 218 Ark. 864, 239 S.W.2d 272 (1951).

A judgment admitting a will to probate could not be set aside on ground of fraud based on fact that counsel for proponents of will persuaded court to appoint executors without bond, since this was an intrinsic matter. Blankenship v. Montgomery, 218 Ark. 864, 239 S.W.2d 272 (1951).

A judgment admitting a will to probate could not be set aside for fraud on ground that mental incapacity of deceased was concealed from the court, since concealment related to intrinsic matter and did not constitute extrinsic fraud. Blankenship v. Montgomery, 218 Ark. 864, 239 S.W.2d 272 (1951).

A judgment admitting a will to probate could not be set aside on the ground that counsel for proponents had concealed from the court the fact that a “living trust” was incorporated in will where reference to trust appeared on the face of the instrument, since fraud alleged was intrinsic. Blankenship v. Montgomery, 218 Ark. 864, 239 S.W.2d 272 (1951).

Where brothers of testator were not given notice of the admission of the will to probate in the manner required by §28-40-111, but were mentioned as heirs in the petition to probate, their petition to set aside the will filed six months and 13 days after the admission of the will to probate was filed in time under subsection (b)(2)(C) of this section. Jones v. Jones, 234 Ark. 163, 350 S.W.2d 673 (1961) (decision prior to 1985 amendment).

Where petition to contest a will reached the county clerk and, though not filed separately, was placed in the case file of deceased's estate within the statutory period for filing, the petition was deemed timely filed under this section. Edwards v. Brimm, 236 Ark. 588, 367 S.W.2d 433 (1963).

Legal malpractice suit based on an attorney's handling of an estate was not ripe for adjudication because a challenge could still be raised in the probate proceedings since the longer limitations period for challenges based on discovery of another will applied, even if the challenge was supported by a copy of the will.Kennedy v. Ferguson, 679 F.3d 998 (8th Cir. 2012).

Trial court did not err in finding that appellant contested the will, and although appellant claimed that she never made a written objection to the will under subsection (a) of this section and thus she could not have challenged the will, the court disagreed; by submitting a second will for probate drafted a week after the first will, in appellant's handwriting and leaving the bulk of the estate to herself, appellant clearly challenged the validity of the first will and sufficient evidence supported the conclusion that appellant was not acting in good faith when she offered that will for probate, such that her actions triggered the no-contest clause in the will.Seymour v. Biehslich, 371 Ark. 359, 266 S.W.3d 722 (2007).

Cited: Negovanov v. Wensko, 248 Ark. 1109, 455 S.W.2d 929 (1970); Coleman v. Coleman, 257 Ark. 404, 520 S.W.2d 239 (1975); Carpenter v. Horace Mann Life Ins. Co., 21 Ark. App. 112, 730 S.W.2d 502 (1987); Spicer v. Estate of Spicer, 55 Ark. App. 267, 935 S.W.2d 576 (1996).

All persons notified as provided by § 28-40-110 or by this section shall be deemed parties to the proceeding for all purposes.

When surviving son offered a will for probate, he had the burden of proving the genuineness of the signatures; he made such proof, and the will was admitted to probate. When other persons sought to contest the will, they had the burden of sustaining the contest on the alleged ground that the signatures to the will were a forgery. Ross v. Edwards, 231 Ark. 902, 333 S.W.2d 487 (1960).

Ark. L. Rev.

Haught, 1988 Update to the Arkansas Probate System: An Overview of Recent Developments in Arkansas Probate Practice, 42 Ark. L. Rev. 631.

Trial court had authority to consider a challenge to decedent's will subsequent to a hearing at which it orally announced its decision to admit a purported will to probate; subsection (a) of this section was not applicable because no written order was entered after the hearing and, thus, there was no order permitting a will to probate to set aside. Judkins v. Hoover, 351 Ark. 552, 95 S.W.3d 768 (2003), overruled in part, West v. Williams, 355 Ark. 148, 133 S.W.3d 388 (2003).

Cited: Negovanov v. Wensko, 248 Ark. 1109, 455 S.W.2d 929 (1970); Coleman v. Coleman, 257 Ark. 404, 520 S.W.2d 239 (1975); Jackson v. Braden, 290 Ark. 117, 717 S.W.2d 206 (1986); Carpenter v. Horace Mann Life Ins. Co., 21 Ark. App. 112, 730 S.W.2d 502 (1987).

When a will is presented for probate under the provisions of this section, the proceedings shall be deemed a part of the proceedings for probate or for administration already initiated.

If notice by publication has been given as provided in § 28-40-110 or in § 28-40-111, no further notice by publication is necessary unless ordered by the court. However, notice of the hearing shall be given to each heir and to each devisee named and the executor nominated in this or in any other will offered for or admitted to probate whose place of residence is known, and notice shall be given to such other persons as the court may direct.

Probate cases are tried de novo on appeal. Gilbert v. Gilbert, 47 Ark. App. 37, 883 S.W.2d 859 (1994).

Cited: Coleman v. Coleman, 257 Ark. 404, 520 S.W.2d 239 (1975); Armstrong v. Butler, 262 Ark. 31, 553 S.W.2d 453 (1977).

By the testimony of at least two (2) attesting witnesses, if living at known addresses within the continental United States and capable of testifying; or

If only one (1) or neither of the attesting witnesses is living at a known address within the continental United States and capable of testifying, or if, after the exercise of reasonable diligence, the proponent of the will is unable to procure the testimony of two (2) attesting witnesses, in either event the will may be established by the testimony of at least two (2) credible disinterested witnesses.

The witnesses shall prove the handwriting of the testator and such other facts and circumstances, including the handwriting of the attesting witnesses whose testimony is not available, as would be sufficient to prove a controverted issue in equity, together with the testimony of any attesting witness whose testimony is procurable with the exercise of due diligence.

Ark. L. Rev.

Proof of Wills, 9 Ark. L. Rev. 394.

Wills — Proof of Testamentary Intent in Holographic Codicils, 25 Ark. L. Rev. 376.

Wills — Validity of Signature for Holographic Wills, 28 Ark. L. Rev. 521.

Subsections (a)-(c) of this section and subsection (d) of this section are not contradictory, but should be read together in determining admissible evidence in a suit to probate will. In re Altheimer's Estate, 221 Ark. 941, 256 S.W.2d 719 (1953).

Once the signing of a will is proven by two attesting witnesses, and there is no suggestion of fraud or undue influence, there is a presumption that the testator declared to the attesting witnesses that the instrument was his will; and that he either signed in front of them or acknowledged to them his signature on the instrument; and that the attesting witnesses signed at the request of and in the presence of the testator. In re Estate of Sharp, 306 Ark. 268, 810 S.W.2d 952 (Ark. 1991).

An attorney who drafted a will and witnessed it, but who was not named in the will, was competent to testify as an attesting witness. Sullivant v. Sullivant, 236 Ark. 95, 364 S.W.2d 665 (1963).

When surviving son offered a will for probate, he had the burden of proving the genuineness of the signatures; he made such proof, and the will was admitted to probate. When appellants sought to contest the will, they had the burden of sustaining the contest on the alleged ground that the signatures to the will were a forgery. Ross v. Edwards, 231 Ark. 902, 333 S.W.2d 487 (1960).

Although testimony as to signature on a will was conflicting where enlarged photographs of the admitted signature of the decedent made it apparent that the signature on the will was a forgery, the court properly refused to admit the will to probate. Thomas v. Barnett, 228 Ark. 658, 310 S.W.2d 248 (1958).

Where 11 witnesses stated that they were familiar with the signature and handwriting of the deceased and expressed their opinion that a proffered will was written entirely in the handwriting of the deceased, but court-appointed expert declared the will a forgery, the court's holding that the will was forged was not against the preponderance of the evidence. Wilson v. Kemp, 7 Ark. App. 44, 644 S.W.2d 306 (1982).

Extrinsic evidence may be admitted when it is necessary to fortify the finding of existence of testamentary intent. Chambers v. Younes, 240 Ark. 428, 399 S.W.2d 655 (1966).

A credible witness to a holographic will is one who is competent and who is worthy of belief. Sanders v. Abernathy, 221 Ark. 407, 253 S.W.2d 351 (1952).

A trial court erred in denying probate of a holographic will on the ground that evidence presented did not meet requirements necessary to establish holographic will where four renters from deceased and two banking officials testified that will was in handwriting of the deceased. Sanders v. Abernathy, 221 Ark. 407, 253 S.W.2d 351 (1952).

Members of a church were competent witnesses to establish holographic will benefiting the church where no gain from the will would inure to the members individually under the will. Barnard v. Methodist Church, 226 Ark. 144, 288 S.W.2d 595 (1956).

Before a court will establish a will as being lost or destroyed, it must be shown that the will was duly executed. Porter v. Sheffield, 212 Ark. 1015, 208 S.W.2d 999 (1948) (decision under prior law).

Where only one attesting witness to will can be produced, it is permissible to introduce testimony on the authenticity of the handwriting of other attesting witness. In re Altheimer's Estate, 221 Ark. 941, 256 S.W.2d 719 (1953).

Where a witness to a will testified that she witnessed the will at the request of the testator and in the presence of the other attesting witness who was then deceased, but whose signature was identified by his son and his widow, this testimony met the requirement of this section for the testimony of “credible disinterested witnesses” and thus the will was sustained as an attested will. Walpole v. Lewis, 254 Ark. 89, 492 S.W.2d 410 (1973).

The trial court erred in admitting a will to probate because the proponent failed to prove the will by either two attesting witnesses or two credible disinterested witnesses, and there was no showing that any diligence was exercised in procuring the testimony of one of the attesting witnesses. Carter v. Meek, 70 Ark. App. 447, 20 S.W.3d 417 (2000).

Proper execution of a will to be probated could be proven by all or any one of the subscribing witnesses, or by only one witness who testified positively to the request of its execution and another witness did not recollect or denied some of the requests. Leister v. Chitwood, 216 Ark. 418, 225 S.W.2d 936 (1950) (decision under prior law).

The requirements outlined in subsection (a)(1) for proving an attested will by the testimony of two attesting witnesses were satisfied where (1) the two attesting witnesses were credible disinterested witnesses, (2) each witness testified that his or her signature was on the will as an attesting witnesses, (3) one witness was able to provide testimony regarding the circumstances surrounding the decedent coming into his office and asking him to draft the will and later a codicil, and he also testified that he and his secretary routinely acted as witnesses to wills prepared for his clients and that they would not sign the document until the testator had signed the will and requested that they attest it, and (4) the other witness testified that she would not have acted as a witness to the will or codicil if they had not been properly executed. Dillard v. Nix, 345 Ark. 215, 45 S.W.3d 359 (2001).

Where the testator and both attesting witnesses were dead, all the contestants had to do was to prove that any one of the three signatures was a forgery, in order to defeat probate, since a valid will, other than holographic, must have two witnesses. Ross v. Edwards, 231 Ark. 902, 333 S.W.2d 487 (1960).

Where only one attesting witness testified that the will contained the signature of the testator and the other witness, the widow of the second attesting witness, only identified her husband's signature as an attesting witness without offering testimony regarding the signature of the testator, the requirements of this section were not met, and the probate judge correctly refused to admit the will to probate. Children's Mercy Hosp. v. Chick, 262 Ark. 520, 559 S.W.2d 3 (1977).

Trial court did not clearly err in finding that a will was witnessed by the appropriate number of witnesses and with the required formalities under this section where the will and the proof of will were signed by three witnesses, even though only two were required, and where the two living witnesses testified, along with the will's notary. Although the testimony was conflicting, the appellate court left to the trial court the weight to be given to the testimony of the witnesses.Baxter v. Peters, 2009 Ark. App. 807, 373 S.W.3d 340 (2009).

This section completely leaves out any procedure for establishing a will which has been effectively destroyed by the testator; it does provide for the method of proving a will which has been lost or destroyed by accident or design of some person other than the testator. The only logical reason for not making provisions for proof of a will destroyed intentionally by a testator, in accordance with §28-25-109, is obvious; there is no will to prove — it has been legally and physically extinguished. Parker v. Mobley, 264 Ark. 805, 577 S.W.2d 583 (1979).

Cited: Pennington v. Pennington, 1 Ark. App. 311, 615 S.W.2d 391 (1981); Upton v. Upton, 26 Ark. App. 78, 759 S.W.2d 811 (1988); Earney v. Sharp, 312 Ark. 9, 846 S.W.2d 649 (1993).

Cited: Baxter v. Peters, 2009 Ark. App. 807, 373 S.W.3d 340 (2009).

Trial court was not clearly erroneous in holding that will was valid or in finding that testatrix intended to bequeath her property by a will instrument which contained additions and interlineations she dictated to bank officer, and which was executed by the testatrix after those additions and interlineations were made. Clark v. National Bank of Commerce, 304 Ark. 352, 802 S.W.2d 452 (1991).

Order which admitted will “conditionally,” reservation of issues involved in will contest, and conduct of parties belied assertion that order admitting will to probate disposed of probate case once and for all. Carpenter v. Horace Mann Life Ins. Co., 21 Ark. App. 112, 730 S.W.2d 502 (1987).

A holographic will shall be proved by the testimony of at least three (3) credible disinterested witnesses proving the handwriting and signature of the testator and such other facts and circumstances as would be sufficient to prove a controverted issue in equity.

A will which has been lost or destroyed by accident or design of some person other than the testator shall be proved by evidence which would be competent and sufficient in a proceeding in equity for the establishment of the lost will. The will so established shall be set forth in the order establishing it.

The provisions of this section as to the testimony of subscribing witnesses shall not exclude the production of other evidence at the hearing on the petition for probate, and the due execution of the will may be proved by such other evidence.

If the probate of a will is not contested, the testimony of the required witnesses may be taken by affidavit, unless the court shall direct otherwise.

If the will is contested, or on motion of an interested person made prior to admission of the will to probate, the will shall be established by testimony taken in the manner required for taking testimony in equity cases, or as the court may direct.

On a petition for the probate of a will, if the court finds that the testator is dead, that the instrument offered for probate was executed in all respects according to law when the testator was competent to do so and acting without undue influence, fraud, or restraint, that the will was not revoked, and that the instrument is his or her last will, then the will shall be admitted to probate as the last will of the testator, but the order need not recite such findings.

On the petition for the appointment of an executor or general administrator, the court shall determine whether the deceased died testate or intestate and shall grant letters accordingly or, on proper grounds, deny the petition.

When a will of a nonresident of this state, relative to property within this state, has been admitted to probate in another appropriate jurisdiction, an authenticated copy thereof, accompanied by an authenticated copy of the order admitting the will to probate, may be filed for probate in this state.

When so filed, together with a petition for the admission of the will to probate in this state, the court shall:

The law of the place of its execution;

The law of the testator's domicile at the time of its execution; or

The laws of this state.

Unless the will is executed in accordance with § 28-25-103 or § 28-25-104, the petition for its probate shall state the time and place of its execution and the testator's domicile at the time of its execution and at the time of his or her death.

(1)Venue for the proceeding shall be governed by the provisions of § 28-40-102.

Where testator changed his residence and domicil after making his will, from Arkansas to Oklahoma, and at the time of his death was a resident of Oklahoma, the will could not be probated in the first instance in Arkansas, notwithstanding the assertion of Arkansas residence made in the will. McCraw v. Simpson, 203 Ark. 763, 158 S.W.2d 655 (1942) (decision under prior law).

A will executed and admitted to probate outside the state of Arkansas is as valid to dispose of real estate situated in this state as if made and admitted to probate here. Apperson v. Bolton, 29 Ark. 418 (1874) (decision under prior law).

A will executed outside the state of Arkansas in conformity to the laws of the testator's domicil will not be a valid will of lands situated in this state unless made in accordance with the requirements of the laws of this state. Crossett Lumber Co. v. Files, 104 Ark. 600, 149 S.W. 908 (1912) (decision under prior law).

An order of a probate court of another state admitting a will to probate in that state may be attacked on ground it has been obtained by fraud. Dodd v. Holden, 205 Ark. 817, 171 S.W.2d 948 (1943) (decision under prior law).

Former Civil Code § 513(5) did not deprive a party interested in the will of a nonresident of the right to contest its probate on the ground of incapacity or undue influence. Selle v. Rapp, 143 Ark. 192, 220 S.W. 662, 13 A.L.R. 494 (1920) (decision under prior law).

Section 28-40-103 which limits the period within which a will may be admitted to probate applies to a nonresident's will which has been admitted to probate in a foreign jurisdiction. Sims v. Schavey, 234 Ark. 166, 351 S.W.2d 145, 87 A.L.R.2d 718 (1961).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, §§ 52, 53; 1951, No. 255, § 4; 1967, No. 287, § 2; 1985, No. 1007, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-2113, 62-2114.

28-40-114. Notice of contest.

(1)If a statement for grounds for objection to admitting the will to probate is filed before it has been admitted and the notice provided for in §28-40-110 has been given, no further notice is necessary unless ordered by the court.

If the notice provided for in §28-40-110 has not been given, the notice therein provided for shall be given and shall further state that the will is being contested.

If a statement of grounds for objection to admitting the will to probate is filed after the will has been admitted and within the time limitations stated in §28-40-113, the court shall fix a time and place for hearing the grounds for objection, and notice shall be given to each heir and devisee whose place of residence is known and, if the grounds for contest include the presentation of another will, to each devisee and the executor nominated in the other will whose place of residence is known, and to such other persons as the court may direct.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 54; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2115.

28-40-115. Contest of will — Rights of persons acquiring interest in property prior to filing of objections.

If, prior to the filing of an objection to the probate of a will, real or personal property or any security interest therein is acquired for value by a purchaser from, or a lender to, the personal representative of the estate or a distributee or devisee of the property by the terms of a will, the purchaser or lender shall take title free of rights of any interested person in the estate and incurs no personal liability to the estate or to any interested person whether or not the distribution was proper or supported by court order.

(1)This section protects a purchaser from, or lender to, a distributee, devisee, or personal representative who has executed a deed or security instrument to the purchaser or lender prior to the filing of objections to the will.

To be protected under this provision, a purchaser or lender need not inquire whether a personal representative acted properly in making the distribution in kind, even if the personal representative and the distributee or devisee are the same person.

Any properly recorded instruments conveying such property on which a state documentary fee is noted pursuant to §§26-60-101 —26-60-103 and26-60-105 —26-60-112 shall be prima facie evidence that the transfer was made for value and shall not be adversely affected should a will be later set aside in the manner provided by law.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 53; 1951, No. 255, § 4; 1967, No. 287, § 2; 1985, No. 1007, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2114.

28-40-116. Will subsequently presented for probate.

If, after a petition for the probate of a will or for the appointment of a general personal representative has been filed and before that petition has been heard, a petition for the probate of a will of the decedent not theretofore presented for probate is filed, the court shall hear both petitions together and determine what instruments, if any, should be admitted to probate or whether the decedent died intestate.

If, after a will has been admitted to probate or after letters of administration have been granted, a petition for the probate of a will of the decedent not theretofore presented for probate is filed, the court shall determine whether the former probate or the former grant of letters should be revoked and whether the other will should be admitted to probate or whether the decedent died intestate.

No will shall be admitted to probate under the provisions of this section unless it is presented for probate before the court orders or approves final distribution of the estate.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 55; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2116.

28-40-117. Proof of will.

An attested will shall be proved as follows:

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, §§ 56, 57; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-2117, 62-2118.

28-40-118. Manner of taking testimony.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 58; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2119.

28-40-119. Conditions on which probate ordered and letters granted.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 59; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2120.

28-40-120. Probate of will of nonresident.

Presume, in the absence of evidence to the contrary, that the will was duly executed and proved and admitted to probate in the foreign jurisdiction; and

Admit the will to probate if it appears from the copy and order that the will was executed and proved in the manner prescribed by:

Notice of the probation of the will shall be governed by the provisions of §28-40-111.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 60; 1967, No. 287, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2121.

28-40-121. Finality of order — Conclusiveness of finding of death.

An order admitting a will to probate or for the appointment of a personal representative, if not contested or appealed from, shall be final, subject to the following exceptions:

It may be reopened at any time prior to the order of final distribution for the purpose of admitting to probate a will not theretofore presented to the court;

It may be vacated or modified for good cause as provided in § 28-1-115; and

The finding of the fact of death shall be conclusive as to the alleged decedent only if the notice of the hearing on the petition for probate or for the appointment of a personal representative is sent by registered mail addressed to the alleged decedent at his or her last known residence address and when a search is ordered for the alleged decedent as provided in § 28-40-112, the court finds that the search was made.

If notice is sent and search made, and the alleged decedent is not dead, he or she may nevertheless at any time recover the estate from the personal representative if it is in his or her hands, or he or she may recover the estate or its proceeds from the distributees, if either is in their hands.

A will determines the rights of the parties under it proprio vigora from the death of the testator. Its probate is necessary to fix the right of the executor to execute it, to point out the person authorized to act, and as a basis and prerequisite to letters testamentary, but is not essential to its validity. Rights under it are not lost by failure to probate, and to establish and protect them, the validity of a will may be shown in any court. Arrington v. McLemore, 33 Ark. 759 (1878) (decision under prior law).

Where, relying upon the statutory presumption of the death of the owner of money, an administrator of his next of kin in good faith received it from a bailee, charged himself with it in his account as administrator, and expended part of it in discharging the debt of the estate before he learned that the owner was alive, the administrator will be protected to the extent of the amount so expended. Beam v. Copeland, 54 Ark. 70, 14 S.W. 1094 (1890) (decision under prior law).

The probation of a holographic will cannot give it effect beyond that given to it by statute. Parker v. Hill, 85 Ark. 363, 108 S.W. 208 (1908) (decision under prior law).

A suit by an heir, presumed dead from absence, to recover money distributed by an administrator may be barred by limitations or laches. Hill v. Wade, 155 Ark. 490, 244 S.W. 743 (1922) (decision under prior law).

An unprobated will cannot be received in evidence as a muniment of title. Dodd v. Holden, 205 Ark. 817, 171 S.W.2d 948 (1943) (decision under prior law).

Cited: Armstrong v. Butler, 262 Ark. 31, 553 S.W.2d 453 (1977).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 61; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2122.

28-40-122. Certificate of probate.

When proved as provided in this subchapter, every will, if in the custody of the court, shall have endorsed thereon or annexed thereto a certificate by the clerk that the will has been probated.

If for any reason a will is not in the custody of the court, the court shall find the contents thereof, and the order admitting the will to probate shall state the contents, and a certificate shall be annexed as provided in subsection (a) of this section.

Every will certified as provided in this section, or the record thereof, or a duly certified transcript of the record, may be read in evidence in any court in this state without further proof.

Ark. L. Rev.

Documentary Evidence — Arkansas, 15 Ark. L. Rev. 79.

Where a will appeared on its face to have been executed in accordance with statutory requirements and was properly proved and probated, the burden was on the contestants claiming that the signatures of the testator and of the attesting witnesses were forgeries. Hamilton v. Hamilton, 178 Ark. 241, 10 S.W.2d 377 (1928) (decision under prior law).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 62; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2123.

28-40-123. Recording will in other counties.

The personal representative shall cause a certified copy of the will, with a certificate of probate annexed thereto, to be recorded in the office of the recorder in each county in this state other than the county of probate in which real property of the decedent is situated, the cost thereof to be an expense of the administration.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 63; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2124.

Subchapter 2

— Arkansas Ante-Mortem Probate Act of 1979

28-40-201. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Ante-Mortem Probate Act of 1979”.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 194, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2134.